North Carolina statutes. Chapter 39. Conveyances.
Article 6. Power of Appointment.

§§ 39-33,
39-34.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Sessions Laws 2017-102, s. 13(a), effective July 12, 2017.

History.

G.S. 39-33

; 1943, c. 665, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2017-102, s. 13(a), effective July 12, 2017. G.S. 39-34; 1943, c. 665, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2017-102, s. 13(a), effective July 12, 2017.

§ 39-35.

Recodified as

G.S. 31D-5-505

by Session Laws 2017-102, s. 13(b), effective July 12, 2017.

§ 39-36.

Recodified as

G.S. 31D-4-403

.1 by Sessions Laws 2017-102, s. 13(c), effective July 12, 2017.